Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Condominiums.
§ 55.1-1936.
Merger or consolidation of condominiums; procedure.

Any two or more condominiums, by agreement of the unit owners as provided in subsection B, may be merged or consolidated into a single condominium. In the event of a merger or consolidation, unless the agreement otherwise provides, the resultant condominium shall be the legal successor, for all purposes, of all of the preexisting condominiums, and the operations and activities of all unit owners’ associations of the preexisting condominiums shall be merged or consolidated into a single unit owners’ association that holds all powers, rights, obligations, assets, and liabilities of all preexisting unit owners’ associations.

An agreement to merge or consolidate two or more condominiums pursuant to subsection A shall be evidenced by an agreement prepared, executed, recorded, and certified by the principal officer of the unit owners’ association of each of the preexisting condominiums following approval by owners of units to which are allocated the percentage of votes in each condominium required to terminate that condominium. The agreement shall be recorded in every locality in which a portion of the condominium is located and shall not be effective until recorded.

Every merger or consolidation agreement shall provide for the reallocation of the allocated interests in the new unit owners’ association among the units of the resultant condominium either (i) by stating the reallocations or the formulas upon which they are based or (ii) by stating the percentage of the overall allocated interests of the condominium that are allocated to all of the units comprising each of the preexisting condominiums, provided that the portion of the percentages allocated to each unit formerly comprising a part of the preexisting condominium shall be equal to the percentages of allocated interests allocated to that unit by the declaration of the preexisting condominium.

If the condominium instruments of a condominium to be merged or consolidated require a vote or consent of mortgagees in order to amend the condominium instruments or terminate the condominium, the same vote or consent of mortgagees shall be required before such merger or consolidation is effective. No merger or consolidation shall affect mortgagee rights, alter the priority of the lien of any mortgage, materially impair or affect any condominium unit as collateral for a mortgage, or affect a mortgagee’s right to foreclose on a condominium unit as collateral without the prior written consent of the mortgagee. A vote or consent of a mortgagee required by this section may be deemed received pursuant to §

55.1-1941

.

History.

2014, c. 659, § 55-79.71:2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1937.
Termination of condominium.

If there is no unit owner other than the declarant, the declarant may unilaterally terminate the condominium. An instrument terminating a condominium signed by the declarant is effective upon recordation of such instrument. But this section shall not be construed to nullify, limit, or otherwise affect the validity or enforceability of any agreement renouncing or to renounce, in whole or in part, the right hereby conferred.

Except in the case of a taking of all the units by eminent domain, if any of the units in the condominium is restricted exclusively to residential use and there is any unit owner other than the declarant, the condominium may be terminated only by the agreement of unit owners of units to which four-fifths of the votes in the unit owners’ association appertain, or such larger majority as the condominium instruments may specify. If none of the units in the condominium is restricted exclusively to residential use, the condominium instruments may specify a majority smaller than the minimum specified in this subsection.

Agreement of the required majority of unit owners to termination of the condominium shall be evidenced by their execution of a termination agreement, or ratifications of such agreement, and such agreement is effective when a copy of the termination agreement is recorded together with a certification, signed by the principal officer of the unit owners’ association or by such other officer as the condominium instruments may specify, that the requisite majority of the unit owners signed the termination agreement or ratifications. Unless the termination agreement otherwise provides, prior to recordation of the termination agreement, a unit owner’s prior agreement to terminate the condominium may be revoked only with the approval of unit owners of units to which a majority of the votes in the unit owners’ association appertain. Any unit owner acquiring a unit subsequent to approval of a termination agreement but prior to recordation of the termination agreement shall be deemed to have consented to the termination agreement. Upon approval of a termination agreement and until recordation of the termination agreement, a copy of the termination agreement shall be included with the resale certificate required by §

55.1-1990

. The termination agreement shall specify a date after which the termination agreement is void if the termination agreement is not recorded. For the purposes of this section, an instrument terminating a condominium and any ratification of such instrument shall be deemed a condominium instrument subject to the provisions of §

55.1-1911

.

A termination agreement may provide that all of the common elements and units of the condominium shall be sold or otherwise disposed of following termination. If, pursuant to the termination agreement, any property in the condominium is sold or disposed of following termination, the termination agreement shall set forth the minimum terms of the sale or disposition.

In the case of a master condominium that contains a unit that is a part of another condominium, a termination agreement for the master condominium shall not terminate the other condominium.

On behalf of the unit owners, the unit owners’ association may contract for the disposition of property in the condominium, but the contract shall not be binding on the unit owners until approved pursuant to subsections B and C. If the termination agreement requires that any property in the condominium be sold or otherwise disposed of following termination, title to the property, upon termination, shall vest in the unit owners’ association as trustee for the holders of all interest in the units. Thereafter, the unit owners’ association shall have powers necessary and appropriate to effect the sale or disposition. Until the termination has been concluded and the proceeds have been distributed, the unit owners’ association shall continue in existence with all the powers the unit owners’ association had before termination. Proceeds of the sale shall be distributed to unit owners and lien holders as their interests may appear, in proportion to the respective interests of the unit owners as provided in subsection I. Unless otherwise specified in the termination agreement, for as long as the unit owners’ association holds title to the property, each unit owner or his successor in interest shall have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the property that formerly constituted his unit. During the period that the unit owner or his successor in interest has the right to occupancy, each unit owner or his successor in interest shall remain liable for any assessment or other obligation imposed on the unit owner by this chapter or the condominium instruments.

If the property that constitutes the condominium is not sold or otherwise disposed of following termination, title to all the property in the condominium shall vest in the unit owners, upon termination, as tenants in common in proportion to the unit owners’ respective interests as provided in subsection I. In such an event, any liens on a unit shall shift accordingly, and a lien may be enforced only against a unit owner’s tenancy in common interest, but the lien shall not encumber the entire property formerly constituting the condominium. While the tenancy in common exists, each unit owner or his successor in interest shall have the exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the property that formerly constituted the unit owner’s unit.

Following termination of the condominium, the proceeds of any sale of property, together with the assets of the unit owners’ association, shall be held by the unit owners’ association as trustee for unit owners or lien holders on the units as their interests may appear. Following termination, any creditor of the unit owners’ association who holds a lien on the unit that was recorded before termination may enforce the lien in the same manner as any lien holder. Any other creditor of the unit owners’ association shall be treated as if he had perfected a lien on the units immediately before termination.

Unless the condominium instruments as originally recorded or as amended by 100 percent of the unit owners provide otherwise, the respective interests of unit owners referred to in subsections F, G, and H shall be as follows:

Except as provided in subdivision 3, the respective interests of the unit owners shall be as set forth in the termination agreement.

Except as provided in subdivision 3, if the respective interests of the unit owners are based on the respective fair market values of their units, limited common elements, and common element interests immediately before the termination, the fair market values shall be determined by one or more independent appraisers selected by the unit owners’ association. The decision of the independent appraisers shall be distributed to the unit owners and become final unless disapproved within 30 days after distribution by unit owners of units to which one quarter of the votes in the unit owners’ association appertain. The proportion of any unit owner’s interest to the interest of all unit owners is determined by dividing the fair market value of that unit owner’s unit and common element interest by the total fair market values of all the units and their common element interests.

If the method of determining the respective interests of the unit owners in the proceeds of sale or disposition is other than the fair market values, then the association shall provide each unit owner with a notice stating the result of that method for his unit and, no later than 30 days after transmission of that notice, if 10 percent of the unit owners dispute the interest to be distributed to their units, those unit owners may require the association to obtain an independent appraisal of the condominium units. If the fair market value of the units of the objecting unit owners is at least 10 percent more than the amount that the unit owners would have received using the method agreed upon by the membership, then the association shall adjust the respective interests of the unit owners so that each unit owner’s share is based on the fair market value for each unit. If the fair market value is less than 10 percent more than the amount that the objecting unit owners would have received using the agreed-upon method, then the agreed-upon method shall be implemented and the objecting unit owners shall receive the distribution less their pro rata share of the cost of their appraisal.

If the method of determining the respective interests of the unit owners cannot be implemented because any unit or limited common element is destroyed, the interests of all unit owners are the unit owners’ respective common element interests immediately before the termination.

Unless the termination agreement provides otherwise, each unit owner shall satisfy and cause the release of any mortgage, deed of trust, lease, or other lien or encumbrance on his unit at the time required by the termination agreement.

Except as provided in subsection K, foreclosure of any mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien, or enforcement of a mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien or encumbrance against the entire condominium, shall not alone terminate the condominium, and foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the condominium, other than withdrawable land, shall not withdraw that portion from the condominium. Foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against withdrawable land shall not alone withdraw the land from the condominium, but the person who takes title to the withdrawable land shall have the right to require from the unit owners’ association, upon request, an amendment that excludes the land from the condominium.

If a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the property that comprises the condominium has priority over the condominium instruments and the lien or encumbrance has not been partially released, upon foreclosure, the parties foreclosing the lien or encumbrance may record an instrument that excludes the property subject to the lien or encumbrance from the condominium.

History.

1993, c. 667, § 55-79.72:1; 2019, c. 712; 2020, cc. 592, 817.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 592, in subsection J, inserted “of any mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien” in the first sentence; deleted subsection L, which read: “The foreclosure of any mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien shall not be deemed, ex proprio vigore, to terminate the condominium”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2020 amendment by c. 817, in subsection C, inserted the third and fourth sentences; in subsection D, deleted “In the case of a condominium that contains only units having horizontal boundaries described in the condominium instruments” at the beginning, inserted “or otherwise disposed of” and “or disposed of” and added “or disposition” at the end; deleted the former first two sentences of subsection E, which read: “In the case of a condominium that contains any units not having horizontal boundaries described in the condominium instruments, a termination agreement may provide for sale of the common elements. The termination agreement may not require that the units be sold following termination, unless the condominium instruments as originally recorded provide otherwise or all the unit owners consent to the sale”; in subsection F, inserted “or otherwise disposed of” in the second sentence, added “or disposition” in the third sentence, and in the last sentence, substituted “period that the unit owner or his successor in interest has the right to occupancy” for “period of occupancy by the unit owner or his successor in interest”; rewrote the first two sentences of subsection G; rewrote subsection I,
adding subdivisions I 1, I 3, and I 5; inserted “mortgage, deed of trust, or other” following “enforcement of a” in subsection J; and deleted subsection L.

§ 55.1-1938.
Rights of mortgagees.

No provision of this chapter shall be construed in derogation of any requirement of the condominium instruments that all or a specified number of the beneficiaries of mortgages or deeds of trust encumbering the condominium units approve specified actions contemplated by the unit owners’ association.

History.

1993, c. 667, § 55-79.72:2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1939.
Statement of unit owner rights.

Every unit owner who is a member in good standing of a unit owners’ association shall have the following rights:

The right of access to all books and records kept by or on behalf of the unit owners’ association according to and subject to the provisions of §

55.1-1945

, including records of all financial transactions;

The right to cast a vote on any matter requiring a vote by the unit owners’ association membership in proportion to the unit owner’s ownership interest, except to the extent that the condominium instruments provide otherwise;

The right to have notice of any meeting of the executive board, to make a record of such meetings by audio or visual means, and to participate in such meeting in accordance with the provisions of §

55.1-1949

;

The right to have (i) notice of any proceeding conducted by the executive board or other tribunal specified in the condominium instruments against the unit owner to enforce any rule or regulation of the unit owners’ association and (ii) the opportunity to be heard and represented by counsel at the proceeding, as provided in §

55.1-1959

, and the right of due process in the conduct of that hearing; and

The right to serve on the executive board if duly elected and a member in good standing of the unit owners’ association, except to the extent that the condominium instruments provide otherwise.The rights enumerated in this section shall be enforceable by any unit owner pursuant to the provisions of §

55.1-1915

.

History.

2015, c. 286, § 55-79.72:3; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.